Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.030

Grounds authorizing change of venue.

The court may, on motion, in the following cases, change the place of trial when it appears by affidavit, or other satisfactory proof:

(1) That the county designated in the complaint is not the proper county; or,

(2) That there is reason to believe that an impartial trial cannot be had therein; or,

(3) That the convenience of witnesses or the ends of justice would be forwarded by the change; or,

(4) That from any cause the judge is disqualified; which disqualification exists in either of the following cases: In an action or proceeding to which he or she is a party, or in which he or she is interested; when he or she is related to either party by consanguinity or affinity, within the third degree; when he or she has been of counsel for either party in the action or proceeding.

[ 2011 c 336 s 79; Code 1881 s 51; 1877 p 12 s 52; 1875 p 6 s 8; 1869 p 13 s 52; 1854 p 134 s 16; RRS s 209.]